Vermont, session 2025-2026, H159.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. REPEALS
30 V.S.A. §§ 8004, 8005, 8006, and 8006a are repealed.
VT LEG #379712 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.159
2025 Page 2 of 12
Sec. 2. 30 V.S.A. § 8002 is amended to read:
§ 8002. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(17) “New renewable energy” means renewable energy capable of
delivery in New England and produced by a specific and identifiable plant
coming into service on or after January 1, 2010, but excluding energy
generated by a hydroelectric generation plant with a capacity of 200 MW or
greater.
* * *
(B) Except as provided in subdivision 8005(c)(3) of this title, “new
“New renewable energy” also includes the additional energy from an existing
renewable energy plant retrofitted with advanced technologies or otherwise
operated, modified, or expanded to increase the kWh output of the plant in
excess of a historical baseline established by calculating the average output of
that plant for the 10-year period that ended January 1, 2010. If the production
of new renewable energy through changes in operations, modification, or
expansion involves combustion of the resource, the system also must result in
an incrementally higher level of energy conversion efficiency or significantly
reduced emissions.
* * *
VT LEG #379712 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.159
2025 Page 3 of 12
(29) “RES” means the Renewable Energy Standard established under
sections 8004 and 8005 of this title. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 3. 30 V.S.A. § 8005a is amended to read:
§ 8005a. STANDARD OFFER PROGRAM
* * *
(c) Cumulative capacity. In accordance with this subsection, the
Commission shall issue standard offers to new standard offer plants until a
cumulative plant capacity amount of 127.5 MW is reached.
* * *
(C) Adjustment; greenhouse gas reduction credits. The Commission
shall adjust the annual increase to account for greenhouse gas reduction credits
by multiplying the annual increase by one minus the ratio of the prior year’s
greenhouse gas reduction credits to that year’s statewide retail electric sales.
(i) The amount of the prior year’s greenhouse gas reduction
credits shall be determined in accordance with subdivision 8006a(a) of this
title.
(ii) The adjustment in the annual increase shall be applied
proportionally to the independent developer block and the provider block.
VT LEG #379712 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.159
2025 Page 4 of 12
(iii) Greenhouse gas reduction credits used to diminish a
provider’s obligation under section 8004 of this title may be used to adjust the
annual increase under this subsection (c). [Repealed.]
* * *
(k) Executed standard offer contracts; transferability; allocation of benefits
and costs. With respect to executed contracts for standard offers under this
section:
* * *
(2) The Standard Offer Facilitator shall distribute the electricity
purchased to the Vermont retail electricity providers at the price paid to the
plant owners, allocated to the providers based on their pro rata share of total
Vermont retail kWh sales for the previous calendar year, and the Vermont
retail electricity providers shall accept and pay the Standard Offer Facilitator
for the electricity. However, during any given calendar year:
* * *
(B) A retail electricity provider that was relieved from the
requirements of this subdivision by the Commission on or before January 25,
2018, shall be exempt from the requirements of this subdivision in any year
that the Standard Offer Facilitator allocates electricity pursuant to this
subdivision if the retail electricity provider meets the following criteria:
* * *
VT LEG #379712 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.159
2025 Page 5 of 12
(ii) the retail electricity provider owns and retires an amount of 30
V.S.A. § 8005(a)(1) qualified energy environmental attributes that is not less
than the provider’s retail sales. [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 4. 30 V.S.A. § 8009 is amended to read:
§ 8009. BASELOAD RENEWABLE POWER PORTFOLIO
REQUIREMENT
* * *
(b) Notwithstanding subsection 8004(a) and subdivision 8005(c)(1) of this
title, commencing Commencing on November 1, 2012, each Vermont retail
electricity provider shall purchase the provider’s pro rata share of the baseload
renewable power portfolio requirement, which shall be based on the total
Vermont retail kWh sales of all such providers for the previous calendar year.
The obligation created by this subsection shall cease on November 1, 2032
unless terminated earlier pursuant to subsection (k) of this section.
* * *
Sec. 5. 30 V.S.A. § 8010 is amended to read:
§ 8010. SELF-GENERATION AND NET METERING
* * *
VT LEG #379712 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.159
2025 Page 6 of 12
(c) In accordance with this section, the Commission shall adopt and
implement rules that govern the installation and operation of net metering
systems.
(1) The rules shall establish and maintain a net metering program that:
* * *
(H) allows a customer to retain ownership of the environmental
attributes of energy generated by the customer’s net metering system and of
any associated tradeable renewable energy credits or to transfer those attributes
and credits to the interconnecting retail provider, and:
* * *
(ii) if the customer transfers the attributes to the interconnecting
provider, requires the provider to retain them for application toward
compliance with sections 8004 and 8005 of this title unless the provider has
fewer than 75,000 customers, in which case the attributes do not need to be
applied toward compliance obligations under sections 8004 and 8005 of this
title; and
(iii) if a retail electricity provider that is 100 percent renewable
under subdivision 8005(b)(1) of this title does not retire the transferred
attributes under sections 8004 and 8005 of this title, requires that the provider
apply an equivalent amount of attributes from distributed renewable generation
VT LEG #379712 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.159
2025 Page 7 of 12
that qualifies under subdivision 8005(a)(2) of this title toward its compliance
obligations under sections 8004 and 8005 of this title. [Repealed.]
(2) The rules shall include provisions that govern:
* * *
(F) the amount of the credit to be assigned to each kWh of electricity
generated by a net metering customer in excess of the electricity supplied by
the interconnecting provider to the customer, the manner in which the
customer’s credit will be applied on the customer’s bill, and the period during
which a net metering customer must use the credit, after which the credit shall
revert to the interconnecting provider.
* * *
(II) The amount of excess generation, as defined in the
Commission’s rules, from existing net metering systems, may be applied to
reduce the provider’s statutory requirements under:
(aa) subdivision 8005(a)(2) of this title for a provider with
fewer than 75,000 customers, not including one that is 100 percent renewable
under subdivision 8005(b)(1) of this title, and
(bb) subdivision 8005(a)(5) of this title for a provider that is
100 percent renewable under subdivision 8005(b)(1) of this title. [Repealed.]
* * *
VT LEG #379712 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.159
2025 Page 8 of 12
Sec. 6. 24 V.S.A. § 4352 is amended to read:
§ 4352. OPTIONAL DETERMINATION OF ENERGY COMPLIANCE;
ENHANCED ENERGY PLANNING
* * *
(c) Enhanced energy planning; requirements. To obtain an affirmative
determination of energy compliance under this section, a plan must:
* * *
(3) be consistent with the following, with consistency determined in the
manner described under subdivision 4302(f)(1) of this title:
* * *
(E) the distributed renewable generation and energy transformation
categories of resources to meet the requirements of the Renewable Energy
Standard under 30 V.S.A. §§ 8004 and 8005; and [Repealed.]
* * *
Sec. 7. 30 V.S.A. § 202b is amended to read:
§ 202b. STATE COMPREHENSIVE ENERGY PLAN
* * *
(e) The Commissioner of Public Service (Commissioner) shall file an
annual report on progress in meeting the goals of the Plan. The report shall
address each of the following sectors of energy consumption in the State:
electricity, nonelectric fuels for thermal purposes, and transportation. In
VT LEG #379712 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.159
2025 Page 9 of 12
preparing the report, the Commissioner shall consult with the Secretaries of
Administration, of Agriculture, Food and Markets, of Natural Resources, and
of Transportation and the Commissioner of Buildings and General Services.
* * *
(7) The report shall include the following information on progress
toward meeting the Renewable Energy Standard (RES):
(A) An assessment of the costs and benefits of the RES based on the
most current available data, including rate and economic impacts, customer
savings, technology deployment, greenhouse gas emission reductions achieved
both relative to 10 V.S.A § 578 requirements and societally, fuel price
stability, effect on transmission and distribution upgrade costs, and any
recommended changes based on this assessment.
(i) For the most recent calendar year for which data is available,
each retail electricity provider’s retail sales and load, in MWh; required
amounts of renewable energy for each category of the RES as set forth in
section 8005 of this title; and amounts of renewable energy and tradeable
renewable energy credits eligible to satisfy the requirements of sections 8004
and 8005 of this title actually owned by the Vermont retail electricity
providers, expressed as a percentage of retail sales and total load.
(ii) The report shall summarize the energy transformation projects
undertaken pursuant to section 8005 of this title, their costs and benefits, their
VT LEG #379712 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.159
2025 Page 10 of 12
avoided fossil fuel consumption and greenhouse gas emissions, and, if
applicable, energy savings.
(iii) The report shall summarize statewide progress toward
achieving each of the categories set forth in section 8005 of this title.
(iv) The report shall assess how costs and benefits of the RES are
being distributed across State, to the extent possible given available data, by
retail electricity service territory, municipality, and environmental justice focus
populations, as defined by 3 V.S.A. § 6002. Such an assessment shall consider
metrics to monitor affordability of electric rates.
(B) Projections, looking at least 10 years ahead, of the impacts of the
RES.
(i) The Department shall consider at least three scenarios based on
high, mid-range, and low energy price forecasts.
(ii) The Department shall provide an opportunity for public
comment on the model during its development and make the model and
associated documents available on the Department’s website.
(iii) The Department shall project, for the State, the impact of the
RES in each of the following areas: electric utility rates, total energy
consumption, electric energy consumption, fossil fuel consumption, and
greenhouse gas emissions. The report shall compare the amount or level in
each of these areas with and without the program.
VT LEG #379712 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.159
2025 Page 11 of 12
(C) An assessment of whether the requirements of the RES have been
met to date, and any recommended changes needed to achieve those
requirements.
(D) A summary of the activities of distributed renewable generation
programs that support the achievement of the RES, including:
(i) Standard Offer Program under section 8005a of this title,
including the number of plants participating in the Program, the prices paid by
the Program, and the plant capacity and average annual energy generation of
the participating plants. The report shall present this information as totals for
all participating plants and by category of renewable energy technology. The
report also shall identify the number of applications received, the number of
participating plants under contract, and the number of participating plants
actually in service.
(ii) the net metering program, including: the current pace of net
metering deployment, both statewide and within the service territory of each
retail electricity provider; the ownership and transfer of the environmental
attributes of energy generated by net metering systems and of any associated
tradeable renewable energy credits; and any other information relevant to the
costs and benefits of net metering. [Repealed.]
(8) The report shall include any recommendations for statutory change
related to sections 8004, 8005, 8005a, 8010, and 8011 of this title.
VT LEG #379712 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.159
2025 Page 12 of 12
* * *
Sec. 8. 30 V.S.A. § 8127 is amended to read:
§ 8127. TRADEABLE CLEAN HEAT CREDITS
* * *
(k) Credit eligibility.
(1) All eligible clean heat measures that are delivered in Vermont
beginning on January 1, 2023 shall be eligible for clean heat credits and may
be retired and count towards an obligated party’s emission reduction
obligations, regardless of who creates or delivers them and regardless of
whether their creation or delivery was required or funded in whole or in part by
other federal or State policies and programs. This includes individual
initiatives, emission reductions resulting from the State’s energy efficiency
programs, and the low-income weatherization program, and the Renewable
Energy Standard Tier 3 program. Clean heat measures delivered or installed
pursuant to any local, State, or federal program or policy may count both
towards goals or requirements of such programs and policies and be eligible
clean heat measures that count towards the emission reduction obligations of
this chapter.
* * *
Sec. 9. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379712 v.1